Massachusetts, session 194th, H2820.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special laws to the contrary, salary adjustments and other
economic benefits submitted to the general court by the governor under section 7 of chapter
150E, unless rejected by the general court or withdrawn by the governor, shall be considered in
effect thirty days after submission; provided further, that funds from a prior appropriated reserve
account established to fund the incremental costs of salary adjustments and other economic
benefits authorized by a collective bargaining agreement shall be used to fund salary adjustments
and other economic benefits for collective bargaining agreements that take effect under this Act.
of 1